ja_JP.aff
SET UTF-8
LANG ja

# う行
SFX	U	Y	7
SFX	U	う	あ	う
SFX	U	う	い	う
SFX	U	う	え	う
SFX	U	う	お	う
SFX	U	う	わ	う
SFX	U	う	っ	う
SFX	U	う	ゑ	う

# く行
SFX	K	Y	6
SFX	K	く	か	く
SFX	K	く	き	く
SFX	K	く	け	く
SFX	K	く	こ	く
SFX	K	く	い	く
SFX	K	く	っ	く

# ぐ行
SFX	G	Y	5
SFX	G	ぐ	が	ぐ
SFX	G	ぐ	ぎ	ぐ
SFX	G	ぐ	げ	ぐ
SFX	G	ぐ	ご	ぐ
SFX	G	ぐ	い	ぐ

# す行
SFX	S	Y	4
SFX	S	す	さ	す
SFX	S	す	し	す
SFX	S	す	せ	す
SFX	S	す	そ	す

# ず行
SFX	Z	Y	4
SFX	Z	ず	ざ	ず
SFX	Z	ず	じ	ず
SFX	Z	ず	ぜ	ず
SFX	Z	ず	ぞ	ず

# つ行
SFX	T	Y	5
SFX	T	つ	た	つ
SFX	T	つ	ち	つ
SFX	T	つ	て	つ
SFX	T	つ	と	つ
SFX	T	つ	っ	つ

# づ行
SFX	D	Y	4
SFX	D	づ	だ	づ
SFX	D	づ	ぢ	づ
SFX	D	づ	で	づ
SFX	D	づ	ど	づ

# ぬ行
SFX	N	Y	5
SFX	N	ぬ	な	ぬ
SFX	N	ぬ	に	ぬ
SFX	N	ぬ	ね	ぬ
SFX	N	ぬ	の	ぬ
SFX	N	ぬ	ん	ぬ

# ふ行
SFX	F	Y	4
SFX	F	ふ	は	ふ
SFX	F	ふ	ひ	ふ
SFX	F	ふ	へ	ふ
SFX	F	ふ	ほ	ふ

# ぶ行
SFX	B	Y	5
SFX	B	ぶ	ば	ぶ
SFX	B	ぶ	び	ぶ
SFX	B	ぶ	べ	ぶ
SFX	B	ぶ	ぼ	ぶ
SFX	B	ぶ	ん	ぶ

# む行
SFX	M	Y	5
SFX	M	む	ま	む
SFX	M	む	み	む
SFX	M	む	め	む
SFX	M	む	も	む
SFX	M	む	ん	む

# る行
SFX	R	Y	7
SFX	R	る	ら	る
SFX	R	る	り	る
SFX	R	る	れ	る
SFX	R	る	ろ	る
SFX	R	る	っ	る
SFX	R	る	い	る
SFX	R	る	0	る

# ゆ行
SFX	Y	Y	4
SFX	Y	ゆ	や	ゆ
SFX	Y	ゆ	よ	ゆ
SFX	Y	ゆ	い	ゆ
SFX	Y	ゆ	え	ゆ

# 形容詞
SFX	X	Y	1
SFX	X	い	0	い
