ja_JP.dic
あい変わらず/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
あきさる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
あける/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
あじをしめる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
あたる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
あどめもない/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
あまてらす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
あらだつ/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
あわせかんがえる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
いいきかせる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
いいはなす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
いかんなく/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
いきる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
いしんにかかわる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
いだす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
いつつ/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
いひょうをつく/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
いらなけく/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
いわれない/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
うけいれる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
うすつく/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
うちいう/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
うちとける/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
うつく/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
うまいしるをすう/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
うらみにむくゆるにとくをもってす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
うわべをかざる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
えらがはる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
おいつく/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
おおせつける/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
おくゆかしい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
おしあう/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
おしまい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
おちいりやすい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
おとこぐい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
おひなる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
おもいあやまる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
おもいみる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
およるなる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
おんばく/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
かいこむ/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
かえらかす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
かがやける/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
かきたゆ/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
かぎこむ/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
かけだす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
かざかみにおけない/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
かぜはふけどもやまはうごかず/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
かたらく/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
かってがましい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
かばい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
かみ合せる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
かりあげる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
かわりない/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
かんはついれず/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
がをはる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
きがめいる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ききほれる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
きぜわしい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
きにもとめず/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
きもをひやす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
きらめく/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
きりむすぶ/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ぎちょうをつとめる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
くいのばす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
くすりにしたくもない/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
くちほどにもない/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
くみちがい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
くりひろげる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ぐず/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
けじめをくう/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
けむっぽい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
げつ/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
こうじん/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
こぎつける/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
こころをひきつける/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
こつずいにいる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
こにくい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
こむやくしい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ごきをつよめる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
さいかえる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
さきいず/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
さしいる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
さしほらす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
さぶめく/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
さんする/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
しおる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
しごとにたえる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
したてる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
しなれる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
しぶくる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
しめる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
しゅつ/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
しょっぱい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
しろめをむく/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
じごくでほとけにあう/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
じょう/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
すがたをけす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
すじぼねをぬかれたよう/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
すべてのみちはローマにつうず/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
すりへらす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ずんながる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
せすじがこおる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
せりたてる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
そうず/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
そだちがよい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
そらのごい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
たいざんもぎけつよりくずる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
たきのよう/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
たたきあげる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
たちかえる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
たちよる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
たのしい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
たもちあい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
だきしめたい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ちえことぶ/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ちまう/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ちょちょくる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
つかいくずす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
つきかかる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
つき合せる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
つごうのよろしい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
つなぎ変える/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
つみとる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
つれそう/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
てずれる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
てをよごす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
でっくわす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
とうもない/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
とくしょくづける/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
とっちめる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
とびたつ/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
とらまえる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
とりちらす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
とろかす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
どすどす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
なかちがい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
なきわかれる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
なしおわる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
なのです/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ならす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
なんとなく/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
にくぶく/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
にのくがつげない/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ぬかす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ぬらつく/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ねじころす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ねびえしらず/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
のく/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
のべあう/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
のりすごす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
はえかわる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
はぐれる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
はじらい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
はっぽうまるくおさまる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
はねる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
はらだつ/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
はんたいにまわる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ばんずる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ひきこかす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ひきまわす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ひっかかる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ひとくせもふたくせもある/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ひねりまわす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ひらめく/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ぴくぴく/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ふきぬける/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ふたたびとる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ふみごほめかす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ふりだしにもどす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ふんどし一つ/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ぶつかりあう/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
へびあなにいる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ほえる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ほっこしゅうもない/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ほらをふく/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ぽたぽたおちる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
まきこむ/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
まじる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
まつわりつく/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
まよわかす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
みがまえる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
みたくもない/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
みなれる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
みるみる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
むしがおこる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
むねをなでおろす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
めぐらう/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
めのさやをはずす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
もうしつぐ/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
もちおい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
もとおろう/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
もめる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
やく/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
やちんをためる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ややっこしい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ゆがく/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ゆびおりかぞえる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
よいねまどい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
よごもる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
よびぐす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
よみとく/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
よわりこむ/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
りょうまがゆく/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
わかいときはにどない/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
わこう/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
わりきる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ウィルソンアメリカむしくい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ギブスをはめる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
スゴい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
テコでもうごかない/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
バスに乗り遅れる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ホロにがい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
ワーテルローの戦い/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
一肩脱ぐ/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
下燻る/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
丸く收める/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
乞い願う/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
亡くす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
仕亊を遲らせる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
仝舟相救う/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
似す/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
余裕しゃくしゃく/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
保険を掛ける/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
傍近く/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
免許を取る/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
再び述べる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
凭れ合い/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
出遲れる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
切り離れる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
刺繡い/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
力ずく/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
勤む/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
危める/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
取ってくる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
取り繕う/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
受け払い/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
古惚ける/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
名せりふ/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
吹かす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
呑み込みが早い/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
和らげる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
啖ず/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
噂をすれば影がさす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
国境を侵す/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
城下の盟い/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
墓仕舞い/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
多く/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
天に口なし人を以て言わしむ/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
好かんたらしい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
嬉しむ/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
害をなす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
寝直す/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
小気味良い/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
居心地の良い/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
川の字に寝る/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
差す/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
干っ付く/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
度量の狭い/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
引き局ぬ/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
引っ熟す/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
張り切れる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
彩色く/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
後進に道を讓る/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
御茶する/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
心置き無い/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
怖む/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
思ひ暮る/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
恐げ立つ/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
悪い/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
想い焦れる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
態とめく/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
戀しい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
手がすく/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
手薬煉引く/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
打ち紛る/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
打畱める/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
折り返す/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
押し出す/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
拐ふ/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
持て参る/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
振掛ける/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
捻じくる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
控える/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
掻っ穿る/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
搔きたくる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
摩りつける/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
擦り合わせる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
救い様のない/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
斜向こう/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
早い/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
時雨れる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
書きまちがい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
有らしめる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
村拂い/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
染變える/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
植込む/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
欠かす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
歷史は繰り返す/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
比おい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
気負い込む/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
水を遣る/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
河淸を俟つ/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
注ぎ出す/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
浮れ歩く/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
淸まる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
溢れ﨤る/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
潜む/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
灸を据える/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
無くても良い/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
煑合わせる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
燃える/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
爺むさい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
犬猿の仲である/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
現す/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
生ひ優る/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
申し交わす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
疎拔く/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
登る/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
目が無い/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
直隱す/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
眩れる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
知行爭い/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
神留る/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
穐さる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
突合う/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
立ち縋る/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
竪子の名を成す/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
箝げる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
紋め殺す/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
経を念じる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
綴り合せる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
縮み込む/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
置き籠む/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
老い癡らふ/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
聞き困ず/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
聲を上げる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
肺肝を碎く/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
腐り合う/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
臥い伏す/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
船酔い/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
苦み掛く/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
萬能足りて一心足らず/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
薄める/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
蛙は口ゆえ蛇に呑まるる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
行き着く/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
被害者が出る/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
見え渡る/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
見當る/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
角突き合い/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
言い拔ける/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
言わんとする/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
討ず/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
話し込む/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
読みよい/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
謁する/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
貞はる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
貸しきる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
赫かす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
跪く/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
踏締める/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
身繕い/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
辞ない/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
追い捲る/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
途立つ/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
遅く/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
遣り盡す/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
酔ひ痴る/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
釣り付ける/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
鏤められている/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
関係が無い/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
隂氣臭い/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
雪崩れる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
面倒見の良い/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
頭の上の蠅も追えない/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
風折る/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
食べはじめる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
餌乞い/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
駆け上る/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
驚かす/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
鼻に掛かる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
煮立たせる/UKGSZTDNFBMRYX
